Maryland, session 2026, HB1083.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
2–201.
(a) (1) There is a county board of elections in each county of the State.
(2) Each local board and its staff is subject to the direction and authority
of the State Board and is accountable to the State Board for its actions in all matters
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1083*

HOUSE BILL 1083
regarding the implementation of the requirements of this article and any applicable federal
law.
(b) (1) (i) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection,
each local board consists of five regular members.
(ii) Three regular members shall be of the majority party, and two
regular members shall be of the principal minority party.
(2) (i) In Prince George’s County, the local board consists of five regular
members and three substitute members.
(ii) Four regular members and two substitute members shall be of
the majority party, and one regular member and one substitute member shall be of the
principal minority party.
(3) (i) In Montgomery County, the local board consists of [five] SEVEN
regular members [and two substitute members].
(ii) [Three] FOUR regular members [and one substitute member]
shall be of the majority party, and [two] THREE regular members [and one substitute
member] shall be of the principal minority party.
(c) Each regular member of a local board and each substitute member of a local
board shall:
(1) be appointed in accordance with subsection (g) of this section;
(2) be a registered voter in the county for which the individual is appointed
for the 5 years immediately preceding the appointment; and
(3) be eligible for reappointment.
(d) (1) The term of a member is 4 years and begins on the first Monday in June
of each year following a gubernatorial election.
(2) At the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a successor is
appointed and qualifies.
(e) Before taking office, a member shall take and subscribe to the oath prescribed
in Article I, § 9 of the Maryland Constitution.
(f) The Governor may remove a member for incompetence, misconduct, or other
good cause, upon written charges stating the Governor’s grounds for dismissal and after
affording the member notice and an ample opportunity to be heard.

HOUSE BILL 1083 3
(g) (1) The Governor shall request the county central committee representing
the majority party or the principal minority party, as appropriate, to submit a list of at
least four eligible individuals from which the Governor may make an appointment of a
regular member of a local board or a substitute member of the local board.
(2) The Governor may reject all of the nominees if the Governor determines
them to be unfit or incompetent, in which case the Governor shall notify the State Board in
writing and request an additional list of at least four eligible nominees from the county
central committee. A third list may be requested in the same manner.
(3) If a list containing the names of four eligible nominees is not submitted
within 20 days of a request or if all the nominees on three lists are rejected, the Governor
may appoint any eligible person who is a member of the appropriate political party.
(4) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, each
appointment shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate of Maryland.
(ii) In Caroline, Dorchester, and Kent counties, if there is no resident
Senator of the particular county, the confirmation required under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph shall be by the House of Delegates of Maryland.
(iii) If an appointee is rejected, the Governor shall make another
appointment from the list or lists submitted under paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection.
If a list is not provided, or the nominees on three lists are rejected, the Governor may
appoint an eligible individual as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection.
(h) (1) Except in [Montgomery County and] Prince George’s County, if a
vacancy occurs on the local board, the Governor shall appoint an eligible person from the
same political party as the predecessor member to fill the vacancy in accordance with
subsection (g) of this section for the remainder of the unexpired term and until a successor
is appointed and qualifies.
(2) An appointment made while the General Assembly is not in session
shall be considered temporary until the appointee is confirmed by the General Assembly.
(i) (1) This subsection applies only in [Montgomery County and] Prince
George’s County.
(2) In the event of the absence of a regular member or a vacancy in the
office of a regular member, the substitute member of the same political party shall exercise
the powers and duties of a regular member until the regular member returns or the vacancy
is filled as prescribed in this subsection.
(3) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, if a member of a local board
dies, resigns, is removed, or becomes ineligible:

HOUSE BILL 1083
(i) the substitute member belonging to the same political party shall
become a regular member of the local board; and
(ii) the Governor shall appoint an eligible person from the same
political party to be the new substitute member.
(4) [In Prince George’s County, if] IF a vacancy occurs on the local board
among the members from the majority party, the Governor shall designate one of the
substitute members from that party to fill the vacancy.
(5) If a substitute member of a local board becomes a regular member as
provided in paragraph (3)(i) of this subsection, dies, resigns, is removed, or becomes
ineligible when the confirming legislative body is not in session, the Governor shall appoint
an eligible person from the same political party as the predecessor substitute member to
fill the vacancy. That individual shall serve until the earlier of:
(i) the adjournment of the next session of the General Assembly; or
(ii) the appointment of another individual to fill the same vacancy.
(j) A board shall meet within 20 days after the beginning of the term to elect one
of its regular members as president.
2–202.
(e) In Montgomery County, the local board shall require an affirmative vote of
not fewer than [three] FOUR duly confirmed regular members of the local board, at least
one of whom shall be a member of the principal minority party, to appoint an election
director.
11–301.
(f) In [Montgomery County and] Prince George’s County, if a member is not
present at the scheduled time for vote canvassing, a substitute member of the board of
canvassers may be sworn in.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That each substitute member of
the Montgomery County Board of Elections in office on the effective date of this Act shall
become a regular member on the effective date of this Act for the remainder of the member’s
term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
June 1, 2026 7, 2027.